District of Columbia, session 26, PR26-0379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
resolution may be cited as the “Reprogramming Request No. 26-91 Disapproval Emergency
Resolution of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 47–363, on October 24, 2025, the Mayor
transmitted a reprogramming request to the Council to reprogram $5,500,000 of Local Funds
from the Office of Unified Communications and the Department of Corrections to the
Metropolitan Police Department to “address year-end spending pressures.” This reprogramming
request is hereby disapproved.
Sec. 3. The Secretary of the Council shall transmit a copy of this resolution, upon its
adoption, to the Office of the Mayor.
Sec. 4. This resolution shall take effect immediately.